Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 5. OPEN GOVERNMENT; ETHICS

SUBTITLE B. ETHICS

CHAPTER 575. ACCEPTANCE OF GIFT BY STATE AGENCY

Sec. 575.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Gift" means a donation of money or property.

(2) "State agency" means a board, commission, council, committee, department, office, agency, or other governmental entity in the executive or judicial branch of state government. The term does not include an institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 336, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 575.002. GIFTS OF $500 OR MORE. This chapter applies only to a gift that has a value of $500 or more.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 336, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 575.003. ACCEPTANCE OF GIFT BY STATE AGENCY GOVERNING BOARD. A state agency that has a governing board may accept a gift only if the agency has the authority to accept the gift and a majority of the board, in an open meeting, acknowledges the acceptance of the gift not later than the 90th day after the date the gift is accepted.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 336, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 143, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 575.004. RECORD OF GIFT. A state agency that accepts a gift must record the name of the donor, a description of the gift, and a statement of the purpose of the gift in:

(1) the minutes of the governing board of the agency; or

(2) appropriate agency records, if the agency does not have a governing board.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 336, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 575.005. ACCEPTANCE OF GIFT FROM PARTY TO CONTESTED CASE PROHIBITED. A state agency may not accept a gift from a person who is a party to a contested case before the agency until the 30th day after the date the decision in the case becomes final under Section 2001.144. In this section, "contested case" has the meaning assigned by Section 2001.003.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 336, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.